Florida, session 2026, SB1310.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 351.38, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 351.38âRailroad crossing safety technology study.â 21 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 22 (a)âThe Legislature finds that improving safety at railroad 23 crossings is critical to protecting the lives of pedestrians, 24 motorists, railway workers, and the general public. Advanced 25 detection and monitoring systems using such technologies as 26 sensors, high-resolution cameras, and data analytics may provide 27 a reliable means to enhance situational awareness and reduce 28 collisions at railroad crossings. 29 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that additional analysis 30 is necessary to evaluate the effectiveness, feasibility, costs, 31 and implementation considerations of such systems. 32 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to direct the 33 Department of Transportation to study the technologies 34 referenced in paragraph (a) before considering any statewide 35 requirements for their deployment. 36 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 37 (a)ââAdvanced detection and monitoring systemâ means a 38 system capable of detecting and classifying objects, such as 39 pedestrians, vehicles, or other obstructions at or approaching a 40 railroad crossing, using technologies including, but not limited 41 to, sensors, cameras, and data analytics. 42 (b)ââHazard assessmentâ means the process of analyzing 43 detected objects or conditions to determine whether a potential 44 safety risk exists at a railroad crossing. 45 (c)ââPublic railroad-highway grade crossingâ has the same 46 meaning as provided in s. 335.141(1)(b). 47 (3)âSTUDY.â 48 (a)âThe Department of Transportation shall conduct a 49 statewide study on the use of advanced detection and monitoring 50 systems at public railroad-highway grade crossings in this 51 state. 52 (b)âThe study must include, but is not limited to, an 53 analysis of all of the following: 54 1.âAvailable and emerging advanced detection and monitoring 55 technologies applicable to railroad crossings. 56 2.âThe effectiveness of such technologies in improving 57 safety outcomes, including collision prevention and hazard 58 mitigation, based on available data from pilot programs, 59 deployments in other jurisdictions, or academic research. 60 3.âTechnical and operational considerations, including 61 interoperability with existing railroad safety systems and 62 operating protocols. 63 4.âCosts associated with the deployment of advanced 64 detection and monitoring systems, including installation, 65 operation, maintenance, and long-term lifecycle costs. 66 5.âPotential funding mechanisms, including federal funds, 67 state funds, grants, or public-private partnerships. 68 6.âCriteria for identifying higher-risk railroad crossings 69 where such technologies may provide the greatest safety benefit. 70 7.âLegal, regulatory, and operational considerations 71 related to the deployment and oversight of advanced detection 72 and monitoring systems. 73 8.âThe respective roles of the state, local governments, 74 and railroad owners in the implementation of such systems. 75 (4)âCONSULTATION.âIn conducting the study, the department 76 may consult with, as appropriate, any of the following: 77 (a)âRailroad owners and railroad industry representatives. 78 (b)âLocal governments with jurisdiction over public 79 railroad-highway grade crossings. 80 (c)âTransportation safety experts and academic 81 institutions. 82 (d)âFederal agencies or national organizations with 83 expertise in railroad safety. 84 (5)âREPORT.âBy December 1, 2026, the department shall 85 submit a report of its findings and any recommendations to the 86 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 87 House of Representatives. The report may include policy 88 recommendations for legislative consideration, but may not 89 recommend or require the mandatory installation or upgrade of 90 railroad crossings. 91 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.